Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201319-5206
Agents and employees.

A land bank
may employ such agents and employees, permanent or temporary, as it may require,
and may determine the qualifications and fix the compensation and benefits
of such persons.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 6.